Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-535
Class V school
districts; control; powers.

All Class V school districts shall be under the direction
and control of the school board
or board of education authorized by section 79-552. The school board or board of education
may make expenditures for supplies, equipment, travel, meals, and lodging
for school programs and activities, including extracurricular and interscholastic
activities, appropriate for the benefit, government, and health of pupils
enrolled in the school district.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 2, p. 317;

Laws 1899, c. 62, § 7, p. 292;

Laws 1901, c. 63, § 8, p. 440;

R.S.1913, § 7008;

C.S.1922, § 6639;

C.S.1929, § 79-2702;

R.S.1943, § 79-2702;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 249, p. 775;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1001.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 288;

Laws 2000, LB 1243, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 53;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 6.